Colorado statutes. TITLE 31 Government - Municipal
PART 8 DOWNTOWN DEVELOPMENT AUTHORITIES
31-25-810. Bond provisions.

Bonds issued pursuant to this part 8 shall bear interest at a rate such that the net effective interest rate of the issue of bonds does not exceed the maximum net effective interest rate authorized, payable semiannually or annually, and evidenced by one or two sets of coupons, if any, executed with the facsimile or manually executed signature of any official of the municipality; except that the first coupon appertaining to any bond may evidence interest not in excess of one year. The ordinance authorizing the issuance of such bonds shall specify the maximum net effective interest rate. Such bonds may be issued as term or serial bonds, in one or more series, may bear such date, may mature at such time not exceeding twenty years' duration, may be in such denomination or denominations, may be payable in such medium of payment at such place or places within or without the state (including but not limited to the office of any county treasurer in which the municipality is located wholly or in part), may carry such registration privileges, may be subject to such terms of prior redemption in advance of maturity in such order or by lot or otherwise at such time with or without a premium, may be executed in such manner, may bear such privileges for reissuance in the same or other denomination, may be so reissued, without modification of maturities and interest rates, and may be in such form, either bearer coupon or registered, with such recitals, terms, covenants, conditions, and other details as may be provided by the governing body, subject to the provisions of this part 8.

The governing body may provide for preferential security for any bonds, both principal and interest, to be issued pursuant to this part 8 to the extent deemed feasible and desirable by such governing body over any bonds that may be issued thereafter.

Said bonds may be sold at, above, or below the principal amounts thereof, but they may not be sold at a price such that the net effective interest rate of the issue of bonds exceeds the maximum net effective interest rate authorized.

Said bonds may be sold at public or private sale as determined by the governing body to be in the best interest of the issuer.

Bonds may be issued with privileges for conversion or registration, or both, for payment as to principal or interest, or both; and, where interest accruing on the bonds is not represented by interest coupons, the bonds may provide for the endorsing of payments of interest thereon.

Subject to the payment provisions of this part 8, said bonds, any interest coupons attached thereto, and any temporary bonds shall be fully negotiable within the meaning of and for all the purposes of article 8 of title 4, C.R.S., except as the governing body may otherwise provide; and each holder of each such security, by accepting such security, shall be conclusively deemed to have agreed that such security, except as otherwise provided, is and shall be fully negotiable within the meaning and for all purposes of article 8 of title 4, C.R.S.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the governing body in any proceedings authorizing bonds pursuant to this part 8:

May provide for the initial issuance of one or more bonds, referred to in this subsection (5) as "bond", aggregating the amount of the entire issue;

May make such provision for installment payments of the principal amount of any such bond as it may consider desirable;

May provide for the making of any such bond, payable to bearer or otherwise, registrable as to principal or as to both principal and interest and, where interest accruing thereon is not represented by interest coupons, for the endorsing of payments of interest on such bonds;

May further make provision in any such proceedings for the manner and circumstances in and under which any such bond may in the future, at the request of the holder thereof, be converted into bonds of smaller denominations, which bonds of smaller denominations may in turn be either coupon bonds or bonds registrable as to principal, or principal and interest, or both.

If lost or completely destroyed, any security authorized by this part 8 may be reissued in the form and tenor of the lost or destroyed security upon the owner furnishing, to the satisfaction of the governing body, proof of ownership; proof of loss or destruction; a surety bond in twice the face amount of the security, including any unmatured coupons appertaining thereto; and payment of the cost of preparing and issuing the new security.

Any officer authorized to execute any bond, after filing with the secretary of state his manual signature certified by him under oath, may execute or cause to be executed, with a facsimile signature in lieu of his manual signature, any bond authorized in this part 8, if such a filing is not a condition of execution with a facsimile signature of any interest coupon, and if at least one signature required or permitted to be placed on each such bond, excluding any interest coupon, is manually subscribed. An officer's facsimile signature shall have the same legal effect as his manual signature.

Source:

L. 76:

Entire part added, p. 706, § 1, effective April 26.

L. 77:

(1) amended, p. 1476, § 7, effective June 19.

31-25-811. Refunding bonds.

By ordinance adopted by the governing body at a regular or special meeting, by vote of a majority of the members of the governing body, any bonds issued under this part 8 may be refunded by the municipality without an election, subject to the provisions concerning their payment and to any other contractual limitations in the proceedings authorizing their issuance or otherwise relating thereto.

Any bonds issued for refunding purposes may either be delivered in exchange for the outstanding bonds authorized to be refunded or may be sold as provided in this part 8 for the sale of other bonds.

No bonds may be refunded under this part 8 unless the holders thereof voluntarily surrender them for exchange or payment or unless they either mature or are callable for prior redemption under their terms within ten years from the date of issuance of the refunding bonds. Provision shall be made for paying the bonds within said period of time. No maturity of any bonds refunded may be extended over fifteen years. The rate of interest on such refunding bonds shall be determined by the authority. The principal amount of the refunding bonds may exceed the principal amount of the refunded bonds if the aggregate principal and interest costs of the refunding bonds do not exceed such unaccrued costs of the bonds refunded, except to the extent any interest on the bonds refunded in arrears or about to become due is capitalized with the proceeds of the refunding bonds. The principal amount of the refunding bonds may also be less than or the same as the principal amount of the bonds refunded so long as provision is duly and sufficiently made for their payment.

The proceeds of refunding bonds shall either be immediately applied to the retirement of the bonds to be refunded or be placed in escrow or in trust to be applied to the payment of the bonds refunded upon their presentation therefor. Any proceeds held in escrow or in trust, pending such use, may be invested or reinvested in securities meeting the investment requirements established in part 6 of article 75 of title 24, C.R.S. Such proceeds and investments in escrow or in trust, together with any interest or other gain to be derived from any such investment, shall be in an amount at all times sufficient as to principal, interest, any prior redemption premium due, and any charges of the escrow agent or trustee payable therefrom to pay the bonds refunded as they become due at their respective maturities or due at designated prior redemption dates upon which the authority shall be obligated to call the refunded bonds for prior redemption.

The relevant provisions pertaining to bonds generally shall be equally applicable in the authorization and issuance of refunding bonds, including their terms and security, the bond resolution, trust indenture, taxes, and revenues, and other aspects of the bonds.

Source:

L. 76:

Entire part added, p. 707, § 1, effective April 26.

L. 77:

(1) amended, p. 1477, § 8, effective June 19.

L. 89:

(4) amended, p. 1116, § 29, effective July 1.

31-25-812. Tax exemption.

The bonds and the income therefrom shall be exempt from taxation, except inheritance, estate, and transfer taxes.

Source:

L. 76:

Entire part added, p. 708, § 1, effective April 26.

31-25-813. No municipal liability on bonds.

Bonds issued pursuant to this part 8 shall not constitute an indebtedness of the municipality within the meaning of any constitutional or statutory limitations. Each bond issued pursuant to this part 8 shall recite in substance that said bond, including interest thereon, is payable solely from the revenues or special funds pledged to the payment thereof and that said bond does not constitute a debt of the municipality within the meaning of any constitutional or statutory limitations.

Source:

L. 76:

Entire part added, p. 708, § 1, effective April 26.

L. 77:

Entire section amended, p. 1477, § 9, effective June 19.

31-25-813.5. Limitation of actions.

After the expiration of thirty days from the effective date of any ordinance or resolution authorizing the issuance of bonds pursuant to this part 8, all actions or suits attacking its findings, determinations, or contents or challenging the validity of the bonds shall be perpetually barred.

Source:

L. 77:

Entire section added, p. 1477, § 10, effective June 19.

31-25-814. Remedies of bondholders.

Subject to any contractual limitations binding upon the holders of any issue of bonds or trustee therefor, including but not limited to the restriction of the exercise of any remedy to a specified proportion or percentage of such holders, any holder of bonds or trustee therefor has the right and power, for the equal benefit and protection of all holders of bonds similarly situated:

By an action in the nature of mandamus or other suit, action, or proceeding at law or in equity to enforce his rights against the municipality and to require and compel the governing body to perform its duties and obligations under this part 8 and its covenants and agreements with the bondholders;

By action or suit in equity to require the governing body to account as if they were the trustees of an express trust;

By action or suit in equity to enjoin any acts or things which may be unlawful or in violation of the rights of the bondholders;

To bring suit upon the bonds.

No right or remedy conferred by this part 8 upon any holder of bonds or any trustee therefor is intended to be exclusive of any other right or remedy, but each such right or remedy is cumulative and in addition to every other right or remedy and may be exercised without exhausting and without regard to any other remedy conferred by this part 8 or by any other law.

Source:

L. 76:

Entire part added, p. 708, § 1, effective April 26.

L. 77:

(1)(a) and (1)(b) amended, p. 1478, § 11, effective June 19.

31-25-815. Employees - duties - compensation.

The board shall employ and fix the compensation, subject to the approval of the governing body, of the following, who shall serve at the pleasure of the board:

A director, who shall be a person of good moral character and possessed of a reputation for integrity, responsibility, and business ability. No member of the board shall be eligible to hold the position of director. The director shall take an oath or affirmation in accordance with section 24-12-101. The director shall be the chief executive officer of the authority. Subject to the approval of the board and directed by it when necessary, the director shall have general supervision over and be responsible for the preparation of plans and the performance of the functions of the authority in the manner authorized by this part 8. The director shall attend all meetings of the board and shall render to the board and to the governing body a regular report covering the activities and financial condition of the authority. In the absence or disability of the director, the board may designate a qualified person to perform the duties of the office as acting director. The director shall furnish the board with such information or reports governing the operation of the authority as the board may from time to time require.

A treasurer, who shall keep the financial records of the authority and who, together with the director, shall approve all vouchers for the expenditure of funds of the authority. He shall perform such other duties as may be delegated to him by the board.

A secretary, who shall maintain custody of the official seal and of all records, books, documents, or other papers not required to be maintained by the treasurer. He shall attend all meetings of the board and keep a record of all its proceedings. He shall perform such other duties as may be delegated to him by the board.

Upon recommendation of the director, such clerical, technical, and professional assistants, including but not limited to persons in the fields of engineering, planning, and economic research, as shall, in the opinion of the board, be necessary to provide for the efficient performance of the functions of the board.

Any provision of this section and section 31-25-807 to the contrary notwithstanding and subject to any limitations in the ordinance creating the authority or in any amendments thereto, the board may by resolution establish alternate administrative provisions relating to the administrative organization and structure of the authority and responsibilities of board members, officers, and employees.

Source:

L. 76:

Entire part added, p. 709, § 1, effective April 26.

L. 2018:

(1)(a) amended, (HB 18-1138), ch. 88, p. 698, § 28, effective August 8; (1)(a) amended, (HB 18-1140), ch. 41, p. 465, § 9, effective August 8.

Editor's note:

Amendments to subsection (1)(a) by HB 18-1138 and HB 18-1140 were harmonized.

Cross references:

(1) For the legislative declaration in HB 18-1138, see section 1 of chapter 88, Session Laws of Colorado 2018.

(2) For the legislative declaration in HB 18-1140, see section 1 of chapter 41, Session Laws of Colorado 2018.

31-25-816. Funding - budget.

The authority shall adopt a budget for each fiscal year, shall maintain accounts, and shall cause an annual audit to be made pertaining to the fiscal affairs of the authority. Administrative review of the proposed budget shall be in accordance with the policies of each municipality, prior to submission of the proposed budget to the governing body for approval.

The operations of the authority shall be principally financed from the following sources and such other sources as may be approved by the governing body:

Donations to the authority for the performance of its functions;

Proceeds of an ad valorem tax, not exceeding five mills on the valuation for assessment of property in the downtown development area designated by the governing body;

Moneys borrowed and to be repaid from other funds received under the authority of this part 8.

Source:

L. 76:

Entire part added, p. 710, § 1, effective April 26.

31-25-817. Ad valorem tax.

The governing body may impose and levy an ad valorem tax on all real and personal property in the downtown development district not exceeding five mills on the valuation for assessment of such property for the purposes set forth in section 31-25-807, nondebt funded expenditures allowed under section 31-25-808 (1)(a) and (1)(b), and budgeted operations of the authority. This levy shall be in addition to the regular ad valorem taxes and special assessments for improvements imposed by the governing body. The tax collector shall transmit funds so collected to the appropriate officer of the municipality responsible for the handling of the public money who shall deposit same in the municipal treasury to the credit of the authority. Such funds shall be used for no purpose other than those purposes authorized by this part 8 and upon approval of the board, pursuant to vouchers signed by the designated officer of the authority. The funds of the authority shall be secured as other public funds are secured. Other moneys received by the authority shall forthwith be deposited in the municipal treasury to the credit of the authority, subject to disbursement as authorized by this part 8.

Source:

L. 76:

Entire part added, p. 710, § 1, effective April 26.

31-25-818. Assessments.

The governing body shall have the power to assess against the funds of the authority for the use and benefit of the general fund of the municipality a reasonable pro rata share of such funds for the cost of handling and auditing, which assessment when made shall be paid annually by the board pursuant to an appropriate item in its budget.

Source:

L. 76:

Entire part added, p. 710, § 1, effective April 26.

31-25-819. Conflict of interest.

No board member nor any employee of the board shall vote or otherwise participate in any matter in which he has a specific financial interest, defined as a matter in which the member or employee would receive a benefit or incur a cost substantially greater than other property owners within the district. When such interest appears, it is the duty of the board member or employee to make such interest known, and he shall thenceforth refrain from voting on or otherwise participating in the particular transaction involving such interest. Willful violation of the provisions of this section constitutes malfeasance on the part of a member of the board and is grounds for instant dismissal of any employee. The governing body may by ordinance provide for automatic forfeiture of office by a board member for violation of this section.

Source:

L. 76:

Entire part added, p. 710, § 1, effective April 26.

31-25-820. Construction.

All powers conferred upon municipalities by this part 8 are and shall be cumulative and in addition to those conferred by any other general or special law or municipal charter or ordinance and shall be liberally construed to effectuate the purposes of this part 8. This part 8 is an alternative method of accomplishing its purposes independent of and in addition to any other powers conferred upon municipalities electing to exercise the authority granted by this part 8.

Source:

L. 76:

Entire part added, p. 711, § 1, effective April 26.

31-25-821. Property subject to debt.

Subject to section 31-25-807, all real and personal property located within the district shall continue to be subject to ad valorem taxes levied by the municipality to pay the principal and interest on all existing general obligation debts of the municipality and any future debts which may be authorized by law.

Source:

L. 76:

Entire part added, p. 711, § 1, effective April 26.

L. 77:

Entire section amended, p. 1478, § 12, effective June 19.

31-25-822. Inclusion of additional property.

Subsequent to the organization of an authority, additional property may be included in the district. Proceedings for inclusion shall be initiated by petition to the board of the authority signed by the owner or owners in fee of each parcel of land adjacent to the existing district sought to be included. Any such petition shall include evidence satisfactory to the board concerning title to the property and an accurate legal description thereof. If the board approves said application, it shall then submit the same to the governing body of the municipality. If the governing body also approves said application, it shall then, at a regular or special meeting by amendment to the ordinance treating the authority, redescribe the district so as to include the additional property as described in the petition. From the effective date of said amendment such additional property shall be included within the district and shall be subject to any taxes thereafter imposed by the municipality for the use and benefit of the authority.

Source:

L. 77:

Entire section added, p. 1478, § 13, effective June 19.